Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 1,  chapter 685, Oregon Laws 2015, as amended by section 1, chapter 66,
Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  The amounts authorized,  as provided by ORS 286A.035, for issuance of general obligation
bonds of the state during the 2015-2017 biennium are as follows:
GENERAL OBLIGATION BONDS
General Fund Obligations
(1) Oregon Department of
Administrative Services,
Oregon Health and Science
University, Cancer
Institute (Art. XI-G) ..................... $ 200,035,000
(2) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-G):
(a) Oregon State University:
(A) Forest Science Complex ............. $ 30,140,000
(B) Marine Studies Campus
Phase I ............................................$ 25,155,000
(b) Portland State University,
Neuberger Hall Renovation
and Deferred Maintenance ........ $ 10,220,000
(c) University of Oregon:
(A) Klamath Hall Renovation .......... $ 6,325,000
(B) College and Careers Building ... $ 17,275,000
(C) Chapman Hall Renovation ......... $ 2,550,000
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 1
(d) Oregon Institute of
Technology, [ Center for
Excellence in Engineering
and Technology ]
Cornett Hall Renovation ......... $ 785,000
(e) Blue Mountain Community
College, Animal Science
Education Center ......................... $ 3,331,350
(f) Columbia Gorge Community
College, Middle College
Prototype Facility ........................ $ 7,320,000
(g) Klamath Community College,
Student Success and
Career/Technical Center ............ $ 7,850,000
(h) Mt. Hood Community
College, Technology
Innovation Center ........................ $ 8,000,000
(i) Portland Community
College, American
Manufacturing Innovation
District Building ........................... $ 5,070,000
(j) Rogue Community College,
Health and Science Center ........ $ 8,000,000
(k) Southwestern Oregon
Community College, Health
and Science Building ................... $ 8,000,000
(L) Treasure Valley Community
College, Workforce Vocational
Center .............................................$ 2,830,250
(m) Umpqua Community College,
Industrial Arts Center ................ $ 8,000,000
(3) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-M) .............. $ 176,870,000
(4) Oregon Business Development
Department (Art. XI-N) ............... $ 30,440,000
(5) Department of
Education (Art. XI-P) .................. $ 126,210,000
(6) Oregon Department of
Administrative
Services (Art. XI-Q) ..................... $ 450,735,000
(7) Department of
Transportation (Art. XI,
section 7) ........................................$ 35,475,000
Dedicated Fund Obligations
(8) Department of Veterans’
Affairs (Art. XI-A) ........................ $ 100,000,000
(9) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission (Art. XI-F(1)):
(a) Portland State University:
(A) Land Acquisition for University
Center Building ............................ $ 10,220,000
(B) Broadway Housing Purchase ..... $ 48,580,000
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 2
(C) Corbett Building Purchase ......... $ 5,100,000
(b) Oregon State University
Modular Data Center .................. $ 7,085,000
(c) Southern Oregon University:
(A) Jefferson Public Radio
Addition ..........................................$ 1,545,000
(B) Science Building Deferred
Maintenance .................................. $ 1,695,000
(10) Department of Environmental
Quality (Art. XI-H) ....................... $ 10,000,000
(11) Water Resources Department
(Art. XI-I(1)) ................................... $ 30,520,000
(12) Housing and Community
Services Department
(Art. XI-I(2)) ................................... $ 25,000,000
(13) State Department of Energy
(Art. XI-J) .......................................$ 25,000,000
Total General Obligation
Bonds ..............................................$ 1,435,361,600
SECTION 2.  Section 26, chapter 812, Oregon Laws 2015, is amended to read:
Sec. 26.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2015,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon Business Development
Department, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $4.5 million in net proceeds and interest  earnings for transfer
to the Oregon Business Development Department for  deposit in the Cultural Resources Economic
Fund, established  in section 6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, to provide grants described in sub-
section (2) of this section, plus an additional amount estimated by  the State Treasurer to be neces-
sary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall grant:
(a) $2 million to the Oregon Shakespeare Festival to finance capital projects.
(b) [ $1.5 million ] $509,256 to the Portland Japanese  Garden to expand visitor and educational
facilities at the garden.
(c) $600,000 to Oregon Public Broadcasting to finance renovation of its headquarters and pro-
duction facility.
(d) $400,000 to the Aurora Colony Historical Society to  finance construction of a storage facility
for historical artifacts.
(e) $990,744 to the Confluence Project  to finance a portion of the costs incurred for the
Confluence Project at the Celilo Park site.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) The grants described in this section will  leverage art and cultural resources to create vi-
brant public spaces that integrate art and cultural and natural amenities, sustain Oregon’s rich arts
and cultural experiences and enhance a strong sense of place and community identity.
(b) The factors described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection have the effect of creating jobs,
expanding business and tax revenues and enhancing the economic vitality of Oregon communities.
SECTION 3.
 Section 5, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  (1) For the biennium beginning July 1, 2013,  at the request of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, after the department consults with the  Oregon Business Development
Department, the State  Treasurer is authorized to issue lottery bonds pursuant to ORS 286A.560 to
286A.585 in an amount that produces $1.75 million in net proceeds and  interest earnings for transfer
to the Oregon Business Development Department for  deposit in the Cultural Resources Economic
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 3
Fund, established in section  6, chapter 786, Oregon Laws 2013  [of this 2013 Act ], to provide grants
described in subsection (2) of this section, plus an additional  amount estimated by the State Treas-
urer to be necessary to pay bond-related costs.
(2) The Oregon Business Development Department shall grant:
(a) [ $1.5 million] $509,256 to the Confluence Project to finance  a portion of the costs incurred
for the Confluence Project at the Celilo Park site.
(b) $250,000 to the High Desert Museum to finance programs or projects at  the High Desert
Museum.
(c) $990,744 to the Portland Japanese Garden to expand visitor and educational facilities
at the garden.
(3) The Legislative Assembly finds that the use of lottery bond  proceeds will create jobs, further
economic development, finance public education or restore  and protect parks, beaches, watersheds
and native fish and wildlife, and is authorized based on the following findings:
(a) Leveraging art and cultural resources to create vibrant public  spaces that integrate art and
cultural  and  natural amenities, to sustain Oregon’s rich arts and cultural experiences and to en-
hance a strong sense of place and community identity.
(b) The factors described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection have the effect of creating jobs,
expanding business and tax revenues and enhancing the economic vitality of Oregon communities.
SECTION 4.
Section 5 of this 2017 Act is added to and  made a part of ORS chapter 286A.
SECTION 5. (1) The Oregon Department of  Administrative Services may, with respect to
bonds described in subsection (2) of this section, administer bond  programs and the transfer
or disbursement of bond proceeds through  intergovernmental agreements or grant or loan
agreements containing terms and conditions the department determines  are necessary or
advisable to:
(a) Protect any tax benefit related to the bonds;
(b) Protect the State of Oregon from  liability due to the failure of grantees or borrowers
to comply with  legal requirements related to the bonds, including requirements under the
Internal Revenue Code;
(c) Ensure that bond proceeds are used for authorized or intended purposes;
(d) Ensure that adequate funds will be available for repayment of the bonds; or
(e) Ensure compliance with state and federal law.
(2) The department may exercise powers authorized under subsection (1) of this section
with respect to:
(a) Bonds issued under ORS 286A.560 to 286A.585 (lottery bonds);
(b) Bonds issued under ORS 286A.710 to 286A.720 and Article XI-D of the Oregon Consti-
tution (state power development);
(c) Bonds issued under ORS 286A.760 to 286A.772 and  Article XI-M of the Oregon Con-
stitution (seismic rehabilitation of public education buildings);
(d) Bonds issued under ORS 286A.780 to 286A.792 and Article XI-N of the Oregon Consti-
tution (seismic rehabilitation of emergency services buildings);
(e) Bonds issued under ORS 286A.796 to 286A.806 and Article XI-P  of the Oregon Consti-
tution (school district capital costs);
(f) Bonds issued under ORS 286A.816 to  286A.826 and Article XI-Q of the Oregon Consti-
tution (property owned or operated by state); and
(g) Bonds issued under ORS 286A.830 to 286A.863  and Article XI-F(1) or Article XI-G of
the Oregon Constitution (higher education).
SECTION 6.
 ORS 286A.802 is amended to read:
286A.802. (1) The Article XI-P Bond Fund is established in  the State Treasury, separate and
distinct from the General Fund. Amounts in the Article XI-P Bond Fund may be invested as pro-
vided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and interest earned on the  bond fund must be credited to the bond
fund. Amounts  credited to the bond fund are continuously appropriated to the [ Department of Edu-
cation] Oregon Department of Administrative Services  for the purpose of paying,  when due, the
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 4
principal of, the interest on and the premium, if any, on outstanding Article XI-P bonds. The  de-
partment shall deposit in the bond fund:
(a) Capitalized or accrued interest on Article XI-P bonds;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise provided by the Legislative  Assembly for deposit in the
bond fund;
(c) Reserves established for the payment of Article XI-P bonds; and
(d) Amounts transferred from the School Capital Matching Fund established under ORS 286A.806
as described in section 4, Article XI-P of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) At  the request of the department, the State Treasurer may create separate accounts in the
bond fund for reserves and debt service for each series of Article XI-P bonds as provided in  ORS
286A.025 (2)(g).
SECTION 7.
 ORS 286A.804 is amended to read:
286A.804. (1) The Article XI-P Bond  Administration Fund is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct  from the General Fund. Amounts in the Article XI-P Bond Administration Fund
may be invested as  provided in ORS 293.701 to 293.857, and interest earned on the bond adminis-
tration fund must  be credited to the bond administration fund. Amounts credited to the bond ad-
ministration fund are continuously appropriated to the [ Department of Education ] Oregon
Department of Administrative Services  for payment of bond-related costs. The department  shall
credit to the bond administration fund:
(a) Proceeds of Article XI-P bonds that were issued to pay bond-related costs;
(b) Amounts appropriated or otherwise provided by the Legislative  Assembly for deposit in the
bond administration fund; and
(c) Amounts  transferred from the School Capital Matching Fund established under ORS 286A.806
as described in section 4, Article XI-P of the Oregon Constitution.
(2) At  the request of the department, the State Treasurer may create separate accounts in the
bond administration fund as provided in ORS 286A.025 (2)(g).
SECTION 8.
ORS 286A.796 to 286A.806  are added to and made a part of ORS chapter 286A.
SECTION 9.  ORS 286A.830, as  amended by section 9, chapter 66, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended
to read:
286A.830. As used in ORS 286A.830 to 286A.863:
(1) “Article XI-F(1) bonds” means  bonds issued under the authority of Article XI-F(1) of the
Oregon Constitution for the benefit of a public university.
(2) “Article XI-G bonds” means bonds issued under the authority of  Article XI-G of the Oregon
Constitution for the benefit of a public university  or a community college .
(3) “Bond-related costs” means:
(a) The costs of paying the principal of, the interest on and the premium, if  any, on higher ed-
ucation bonds;
(b) The costs and expenses of  issuing, administering and maintaining higher education bonds
including, but not limited to:
(A) Costs and expenses of redeeming higher education bonds;
(B) Amounts due in connection with credit enhancement devices or agreements for exchange  of
interest rates; and
(C) Fees, administrative costs and expenses of the State Treasurer,  the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services or the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  including the costs of
consultants or advisers retained by the State Treasurer, the department or the commission;
(c) The costs of funding reserves for the higher education bonds;
(d) Capitalized interest for the higher education bonds;
(e) Rebates or penalties due to the United States in  connection with the higher education bonds;
(f) Expenses and liabilities arising from  an inquiry, audit or other action relating to the higher
education bonds by a federal or state regulatory body, including, but not limited to, legal expenses;
and
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 5
(g) Any other costs or expenses that the State Treasurer,  the department or the commission
determines are necessary  or desirable in connection with issuing and maintaining the higher edu-
cation bonds.
(4) “Community college” means a community college or community college district  as
defined in ORS 341.005.
[(4)] (5) “Federal  tax benefit” means the excludability of interest on higher education bonds from
gross income under the Internal Revenue Code, the qualification of  higher education bonds for any
federal interest subsidy payment or any other tax-advantaged status granted under the Internal Re-
venue Code.
[(5)] (6)  “Grant contract” means a contract approved by the department  and executed by a
public university  or community college  and the commission that establishes the terms and condi-
tions for issuance of Article  XI-G bonds and the disbursement of proceeds to the public university
or community college .
[(6)] (7) “Higher education bonds” means Article XI-F(1) bonds and Article XI-G bonds.
(8) “Higher Education Coordinating Commission” includes all offices that  function under
the direction and control of the commission.
[(7)] (9)  “Loan agreement” means a contract approved  by the department and executed by a
public university and the commission that establishes the terms and conditions for  issuance of Ar-
ticle XI-F(1) bonds, lending of bond proceeds and loan repayment.
[(8)] (10) “Loan repayment schedule” means  the schedule of repayment of loans made with pro-
ceeds of Article XI-F(1)  bonds that a public university is obligated to make to the State of Oregon
pursuant to a loan agreement.
[(9)] (11) “Matching amount” means moneys unconditionally available  to a public university or
community college for the  same or similar purposes as the proceeds of Article XI-G bonds issued
for the benefit of the public university  or community college  and meeting the requirements set
forth in Article XI-G, section 1 (3), of the Oregon Constitution.
[(10)] (12)  “Public university” means any institution established as a public university under
ORS 352.002.
[(11)] (13) “Refunding bond” means an Article XI-F(1) bond issued for the purpose of refunding
an outstanding Article XI-F(1) bond, or an Article XI-G bond issued for the purpose  of refunding an
outstanding Article  XI-G bond, regardless of whether the refunding is on a current, advance, forward
delivery, synthetic or other basis.
[(12)] (14) “Revenue sufficiency”  means the condition of having revenues, not including amounts
appropriated by the Legislative Assembly from the General Fund, that  are conservatively estimated
to be  lawfully available and sufficient to pay debt service on particular Article XI-F(1) bonds and
operate the projects financed with the proceeds of those Article XI-F(1) bonds.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 286A.848 is amended to read:
286A.848. (1) In accordance with the applicable provisions  of this chapter, the State Treasurer,
with the concurrence of the [ Director of the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services ] Higher
Education Coordinating Commission , may issue Article XI-G bonds for the benefit  of a public
university or a community college  if:
(a) The [ Higher Education Coordinating Commission ] Director of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services  requests that bonds be issued for the purposes  specified in Article XI-G
of the Oregon Constitution, plus an amount  determined by the State Treasurer to pay estimated
bond-related costs;
(b) The issuance does not exceed the budget authorization for bond issuance established  under
ORS 286A.035; and
(c) A grant contract is executed under ORS 286A.851 prior to sale of the bonds.
(2) The State Treasurer may issue Article XI-G bonds for the purpose of refunding Article  XI-G
bonds without a request from the [ commission] director  when the State Treasurer determines it is
in the best interests of the State of Oregon to refund Article XI-G bonds.
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 6
(3) The State  Treasurer shall deposit the net proceeds of Article XI-G bonds in one or more
project  funds  established in the State Treasury or with a third party under contract with the
[Oregon Department of Administrative Services ] Oregon Department of Administrative Services
and approved by the  State Treasurer. Net proceeds of Article XI-G bonds must be expended for the
purposes described in the commission’s budget authorization.
(4) If at  any time the department and the commission jointly determine that the net proceeds
of Article XI-G bonds deposited in a project fund pursuant to subsection (3)  of this section exceed
the cost  of the project described in the commission’s budget authorization, the department may al-
locate and transfer the excess amount as determined  by the department to other project funds, the
Article XI-G Bond Fund established under ORS 286A.854 or the  Article XI-G Bond Administration
Fund established under ORS 286A.857.
(5) Article XI-G  bonds are direct general obligations of the State of Oregon and must contain
a direct promise on behalf of the State of Oregon to pay the principal  of, the interest on and the
premium, if any, on the Article XI-G bonds. The State of Oregon shall pledge its full  faith and credit
and taxing power to the payment of the principal of, the interest on and  the premium, if any, on
Article XI-G bonds, and the ad valorem taxing power of the State of Oregon may  be pledged to pay
Article XI-G bonds.
SECTION 11.  ORS 286A.851, as amended by section 11, chapter 66, Oregon  Laws 2016, is
amended to read:
286A.851. (1) Prior to the sale of any Article XI-G bonds, except  for refunding bonds, a public
university or a community college  and the Higher Education Coordinating Commission [ shall]
must enter into a grant contract [ that includes: ].
(2) The grant contract must include:
[(1)] (a)  A certification that the requirement for a matching amount is satisfied;
[(2)] (b) Terms  and conditions obligating the public university or community college  to main-
tain any federal tax benefit related to the Article  XI-G bonds and to execute and deliver any re-
quired tax certificates or agreements in connection with any  federal tax benefit related to the
Article XI-G bonds; and
[(3)] (c)  Terms and  conditions indemnifying the State of Oregon against regulatory or
bondholder liability due to the action or inaction of the  public university or community college
related to the Article XI-G bonds.
(3) The grant contract may include:
(a) Reporting and accounting requirements or other conditions  necessary or advisable to
ensure that moneys are expended for intended purposes;
(b) Terms and conditions that are necessary or advisable to ensure compliance  with ap-
plicable laws or regulations; and
(c) Provisions for the payment of fees by a community college to cover costs  of the
commission relating to the execution of  the commission’s responsibilities under the grant
contract.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 286A.863 is amended to read:
286A.863. (1) The Oregon Department of Administrative Services may, in consultation with the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, adopt rules for the purpose of carrying  out ORS
286A.830 to 286A.860 including, but not limited to, establishing:
(a) Fees and costs to be  paid by public universities or community colleges  for administration
of higher education bonds, including reasonable fees and expenses of the State Treasurer  as pro-
vided in ORS 286A.014;
(b) The form, content and timing of information to be submitted by  public universities and
community colleges  to be used by the commission and the State Treasurer to  evaluate revenue
sufficiency for Article XI-F(1) bonds and availability and sufficiency of matching  amounts for Article
XI-G bonds; and
(c) Standards,  terms and conditions for maintaining federal tax benefits related to higher edu-
cation bonds.
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 7
(2) The department or the commission, or both, may periodically bill  a public university  or
community college , without duplicating costs billed by contract, for  the public university’s or
community college’s  proportional share of  costs incurred by the department, or the commission,
in connection with higher education bonds, including, but not limited to:
(a) Bond-related costs of higher education bonds  issued or proposed to be issued to finance or
refinance projects of the public university  or community college ; and
(b) Costs  of legal or financial consultants or advisors, including, without limitation, bond counsel
to the  State of Oregon, for services that are provided at the request of a public university or
community college  in connection with higher education bonds that are issued or proposed to be
issued.
(3) The department and the commission  may each bill at such intervals as may be established
in the department’s or commission’s own procedures and  shall deposit the moneys [ paid by the public
university] received in the applicable bond fund, bond administration fund or other fund relating  to
higher education bonds, as the department or commission determines is  appropriate. A public uni-
versity or community college  that receives a bill for  bond-related costs shall pay the amount billed
by the time and in the manner designated in the billing statement.
(4)(a) The department may enter into  agreements with Oregon Health and Science University
to:
(A) Receive payments from Oregon  Health and Science University of amounts used to pay debt
service on bonds issued by the State  Treasurer to finance joint projects of Oregon Health and Sci-
ence University and one or more public universities; or
(B) Administer tax compliance  obligations of Oregon Health and Science University [ pursuant
to agreements between Oregon Health and Science University and the Oregon University System ].
(b) Solely for the purposes of receiving payments of amounts  used to pay debt service and ad-
ministering tax compliance obligations  related to the bonds, the department may be a successor to,
or an assignee of, the Oregon University System under  agreements between Oregon Health and
Science University and the Oregon University System.
(c) The department may not assume any obligations or liability as the successor to,  or assignee
of, the Oregon University System under any agreements between Oregon  Health and Science Uni-
versity and the Oregon University System, except for obligations or liability relating to  the receipt
of amounts used to pay debt service and the administration of tax compliance obligations.
SECTION 13.  ORS 341.721 is amended to read:
341.721. [(1)] To  provide funds to community college districts for the purposes specified in Arti-
cle XI-G of the Oregon Constitution, the State Treasurer may issue bonds under ORS 286A.848.
[at the request of the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission in accordance with the provisions
of ORS chapter 286A. ]
[(2) The State Treasurer may not issue bonds pursuant to Article  XI-G of the Oregon Constitution
under subsection (1) of this section for a community college project unless a grant agreement has  been
entered into pursuant to ORS 341.735 between the Office  of Community Colleges and Workforce De-
velopment and the community college district that is receiving the bond proceeds. ]
SECTION 14.  ORS 341.725 is amended to read:
341.725. (1) The Community College  Capital Construction Fund is established in the State
Treasury, separate and  distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned on moneys in the Community
College Capital Construction Fund shall be credited to the fund.
(2) Moneys in the Community College Capital Construction Fund are continuously  appropriated
to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission and may be  distributed by the commission for the
purposes described in Article XI-G, section 1  (2), of the Oregon Constitution, pursuant to grant
[agreements] contracts  entered into between the [ Office of Community Colleges and Workforce De-
velopment and community college districts under ORS 341.735. ] commission and  community col-
leges under ORS 286A.851.
SECTION 15.  ORS 341.728 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 8
341.728. (1) The Community College Bond Building Fund  is established in the State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund.
(2) The Community College Bond  Building Fund shall consist of moneys realized from the sale
of bonds issued  pursuant to Article XI-G of the Oregon Constitution  and ORS 286A.848  for the
benefit of community [ college] colleges.  [ districts under ORS 341.721. ]
(3) Moneys in the Community College Bond Building Fund  are continuously appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission and may be  distributed by the commission [ for the pur-
poses described in Article XI-G, section 1 (2), of  the Oregon Constitution, including payment of costs
related to issuing bonds and payment of debt service on bonds, ] pursuant to  grant [ agreements] con-
tracts entered into between the [ Office of Community Colleges and Workforce Development and
community college districts  under ORS 341.735. ] commission and community colleges under ORS
286A.851.
(4) Moneys in the Community College Bond Building Fund may be invested as provided in  ORS
286A.025 until needed for distribution under subsection (3) of this section. If a surplus remains  in
the fund after disbursement, the surplus and earnings from temporary investments shall be  credited
to the [ Community College Bond Sinking Fund. ] Article XI-G Bond Fund  established under ORS
286A.854.
SECTION 16. ORS 341.731 and 341.735 are repealed.
SECTION 17. ORS 341.751, 341.753, 341.755, 341.757, 341.759, 341.762,  341.764, 341.766,
341.768, 341.771, 341.773, 341.775, 341.777, 341.779, 341.782, 341.784 and 341.787 are repealed.
SECTION 18.  ORS 286A.712 is amended to read:
286A.712. (1) Article XI-D bonds are a  general obligation of the State of Oregon and must con-
tain a direct  promise on behalf of the State of Oregon to pay the principal of, the interest on and
the premium, if any, on the Article XI-D bonds. The State of Oregon shall pledge its full faith and
credit and taxing  power to pay Article XI-D bonds, except that the ad valorem taxing power of the
State of Oregon may not be pledged to pay Article XI-D bonds.
(2) In accordance with the applicable provisions of this  chapter, the State Treasurer, with the
concurrence of the [ Director of the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services ] Director of the
State Department of Energy , may issue Article XI-D bonds:
(a) At the request of the [ Director of the State Department of Energy ] Director of the  Oregon
Department of Administrative Services  for any of the purposes specified  in Article XI-D of the
Oregon Constitution, plus an amount determined by  the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-
related costs; and
(b) Subject to the limit on bond issuance established for  the particular biennium in ORS
286A.035.
(3) The State Treasurer may issue Article XI-D bonds for the purpose of financing  the refund
of Article XI-D bonds.
(4) The State Treasurer shall transfer the net proceeds of Article XI-D bonds  issued for the
purpose described in subsection (2)(a) of this section to the State Department of Energy for  deposit
in the Renewable Energy Fund established under ORS 286A.718.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 286A.762 is amended to read:
286A.762. (1) Article XI-M bonds  are a general obligation of the State of Oregon and must con-
tain a direct promise on behalf of the State of Oregon to pay the principal of, the interest  on and
the premium, if any, on the Article XI-M bonds. The State of Oregon  shall pledge its full faith and
credit and taxing power to pay Article XI-M bonds, except that the ad valorem  taxing power of the
State of Oregon may not be pledged to pay Article XI-M bonds.
(2) The State Treasurer, with the concurrence of the [ Director of  the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services ] Director of the Oregon Business  Development Department , may issue
Article XI-M bonds as provided in this chapter, subject to the limit on bond issuance established for
the particular biennium pursuant to ORS 286A.035 and at the request  of the [ Director of the Oregon
Business Development Department ] Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Ser-
vices, for the purpose of financing all or a portion of the state share of costs to plan and  implement
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 9
seismic rehabilitation of public education buildings in the amount  of the state share of costs, plus
an amount determined by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(3) The State Treasurer shall transfer the  net proceeds of Article XI-M bonds issued for the
purpose described in subsection (2)(a) of this  section to the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment for deposit in the Education Seismic Fund established under ORS 286A.768.
SECTION 20.  ORS 286A.782 is amended to read:
286A.782. (1) Article XI-N bonds are a general obligation of  the State of Oregon and must con-
tain a direct promise on behalf of the State of Oregon to pay the principal of, the interest  on and
the premium, if any, on the Article XI-N bonds. The State of Oregon shall pledge its full faith  and
credit and taxing power to pay Article XI-N bonds, except that the ad valorem taxing power of  the
State of Oregon may not be pledged to pay Article XI-N bonds.
(2) The State Treasurer, with the  concurrence of the [ Director of the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services ] Director of the  Oregon Business Development Department , may issue
Article XI-N bonds as provided in  this chapter, subject to the limit on bond issuance established for
the particular biennium pursuant to ORS 286A.035 and at the request  of the [ Director of the Oregon
Business Development Department ] Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices, for the purpose of financing all or a portion of the state share of costs to plan and  implement
seismic rehabilitation of emergency services buildings in the amount of the  state share of costs, plus
an amount determined by the State Treasurer to pay estimated bond-related costs.
(3) The State Treasurer shall  transfer the net proceeds of Article XI-N bonds issued for the
purpose described in subsection (2) of this section  to the Oregon Business Development Department
for deposit in the Emergency Services Seismic Fund established under ORS 286A.788.
SECTION 21.  ORS 286A.798 is amended to read:
286A.798. (1) In accordance with the applicable provisions of ORS chapter 286A, the  State
Treasurer,  with  the concurrence of the [ Director of the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services] Superintendent of Public Instruction , may issue Article XI-P bonds:
(a) At the request of the [ Superintendent of Public  Instruction ] Director of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services  for the purposes specified in Article XI-P  of the Oregon
Constitution, plus an amount determined by the State Treasurer  to pay estimated bond-related costs;
and
(b) Subject to the budget  authorization for bond issuance established under ORS 286A.035 for
the Department of Education for the biennium.
(2) The State Treasurer may issue Article XI-P bonds  for the purpose of refunding Article XI-P
bonds.
(3) The net proceeds of Article  XI-P bonds must be deposited in the School Capital Matching
Fund established under ORS 286A.806 as described in  section 4, Article XI-P of the Oregon Consti-
tution.
(4) If at any time the  superintendent determines that the net proceeds of Article XI-P bonds
deposited in the School Capital  Matching Fund pursuant to subsection (3) of this section exceed the
amount necessary for the purposes described in  subsection (1)(a) of this section and the budget au-
thorization, the superintendent , in consultation with the  Oregon Department of Administrative
Services, may transfer the excess amount to the Article XI-P Bond Fund established under ORS
286A.802 or the Article XI-P Bond Administration Fund established under ORS 286A.804.
(5) Article XI-P bonds  are a general obligation of the State of Oregon and must contain a direct
promise on behalf of the  State of Oregon to pay the principal of, the interest on and the premium,
if any, on the Article XI-P bonds. The State of Oregon  shall pledge its full faith and credit and
taxing power to the payment of the principal of, the  interest on and the premium, if any, on Article
XI-P bonds, except that the ad valorem taxing power of the State of Oregon  may not be pledged to
pay Article XI-P bonds.
SECTION 22.  ORS 291.445 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 10
291.445. (1) Before  July 1 of each fiscal year, the Director of the  Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services shall request from  the appropriate state agency  or division  a certificate as
prescribed in this section. The request shall be made by letter to the agency  or division.
(2) Each state agency  authorized to issue general obligation bonds that are ordinarily to be re-
paid from other than General Fund appropriations shall, on  or before August 15 of each fiscal year:
(a) Certify to the Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services that the
amounts available or that will become available during the current year to  the bond program debt
service fund to pay bond principal  and interest that has accrued or will accrue during the current
year are sufficient and will be  sufficient to pay bond program principal and interest scheduled for
payment during the current year; or
(b) Certify to the Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services that the
amounts available or that will become available during the current year to  the bond program debt
service fund will not be sufficient to pay bond program principal and interest  scheduled for payment
during the current year. A certificate issued under this  paragraph shall specify the amount of the
anticipated current year deficit. The Director of the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services
shall review and confirm the correctness of each certification made under this paragraph.
(3) On or before August 15 of each  fiscal year, the administrative division of the Oregon De-
partment of Administrative Services that has primary  responsibility for accounting for each general
obligation bond program in which the bond principal and interest  is ordinarily to be repaid , in
whole or in part,  from General Fund appropriations shall:
(a) Certify to the Director  of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services that the
amounts available or that will become available during  the current year from General Fund appro-
priations to defray program bond principal and interest that  has accrued or will accrue during the
current year are sufficient and will be sufficient to pay  program bond principal and interest sched-
uled for payment during the current year; or
(b) Certify to the Director  of the Oregon Department of Administrative Services that the
amounts available or that will become available during  the current year from General Fund appro-
priations will not be sufficient  to pay program bond principal and interest scheduled for payment
during the current year. A certificate issued under this  paragraph shall specify the amount of the
anticipated current year deficit.
(4)(a) For a general obligation bond program  for which a property tax may be levied under
the Oregon Constitution,  if a deficit in funds available to pay principal and interest [ in any general
obligation bond program ] is certified and confirmed under subsection (2) or certified under sub-
section (3) of this section, the amount  of the deficit, together with any deficit that is certified for
any other general obligation bond program shall  upon certification constitute a state tax levy on
property that shall be  apportioned among and charged to the several counties in that proportion
which the total assessed value of all the taxable property in each county bears to the total  assessed
value of all the taxable property of the state as equalized.
(b) If any agency fails to make the certification under subsection  (2) or (3) of this section with
respect to any general  obligation bond fund program, the Oregon Department of Administrative
Services shall determine the amount of revenue and  other funds that are available and the amount
of taxes,  if any, that should be levied in addition to the revenues and funds, to pay bond principal
and interest under the program for the fiscal year in question. The additional amount so determined
shall thereupon constitute a state tax levy on property that shall be apportioned,  certified, collected
and distributed as if determined and certified as a deficit by the agency. The Oregon Department
of Administrative Services shall charge the agency for cost recovery for time  spent on that agency’s
behalf.
(5) Immediately after the department  has determined the amount of a state tax levy on property
in accordance with subsection (4) of this section, a certificate of levy, signed by the director of the
department, shall be filed in the office  of the department. If no state levy is required for the fiscal
or tax  year, a certificate so stating and signed by the director shall be filed in the office of the de-
partment.
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 11
(6) If, for any reason, after the close of any regular session of the Legislative Assembly, it  be-
comes necessary to reduce General Fund  appropriations, General Fund appropriations for a debt
service fund of a general obligation bond program described under subsection  (3) of this section may
not be reduced.
[(7) For purposes of this section: ]
[(a)] (7)(a) For purposes of  this section,  state agencies that are authorized to [ issue] finance
projects or programs through the issuance of  general obligation bonds ordinarily to be repaid
from other than General Fund  appropriations [ include but are not limited to: ] are those agencies
that have outstanding general obligation bonds, the debt service on which is not  the subject
of a General Fund appropriation in the current biennium.
[(A) The Director  of Veterans’ Affairs, as authorized by Article XI-A of the Oregon Constitution
and ORS chapter 407 (veterans loans). ]
[(B) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for bonds authorized  by Article XI-F(1) of
the Oregon Constitution and ORS 286A.833 (higher education building projects). ]
[(C) The Department  of Environmental Quality, as authorized by Article XI-H of the Oregon Con-
stitution and ORS 468.195 to 468.260 (pollution control). ]
[(D) The Water Resources Commission and the Water Resources Director, as authorized  by Article
XI-I(1) of the Oregon Constitution and ORS 541.700 to 541.855 (water development). ]
[(E) The Housing and  Community Services Department, as authorized by Article XI-I(2) of the
Oregon Constitution and ORS 456.515 to 456.725 and 458.505 to 458.515 (housing). ]
[(F) The Director of  the State Department of Energy, as authorized by Article XI-J of the Oregon
Constitution and ORS 470.220 to 470.290 (small scale energy projects). ]
[(G) Other  agencies as required by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by rule
adopted using the criterion of this subsection. ]
(b) Each agency  authorized to [ issue] finance projects or programs through the issuance of
general obligation bonds that are ordinarily to be repaid from other than  General Fund appropri-
ations shall determine the amount of revenues or  other funds that are available and the amount of
taxes, if any, that should be  levied for the ensuing year in the manner required under rules adopted
by the Oregon Department  of Administrative Services and make the certification required under
subsection (2) of this section.
(8)(a) For purposes of this section,  state agencies that are authorized to [ issue] finance
projects or programs through the issuance of  general obligation bonds that are ordinarily  to be
repaid from General Fund appropriations [ include but are not limited to: ] are  those agencies that
have outstanding general  obligation bonds, the debt service on which is the subject of a
General Fund appropriation in the current biennium.
[(A) The State Board of Forestry and the State  Forester, as authorized by Article XI-E of the
Oregon Constitution and ORS 530.210 to 530.280 (state reforestation). ]
[(B) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for bonds authorized  by Article XI-G of the
Oregon Constitution and ORS 286A.848 (higher education and community colleges). ]
[(C) Other  agencies as required by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by rule
adopted using the criterion of this subsection. ]
(b) Each agency authorized to [ issue] finance projects or programs through the  issuance of
general obligation bonds  ordinarily to be repaid from General Fund appropriations shall furnish any
data required by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services to determine the amount of re-
venues or other funds that are available and the amount of taxes, if any, that should  be levied for
the ensuing year and the administrative division  of the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices that has primary responsibility for  accounting shall make the determination for purposes of
the making of the certification required under subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 23.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 12
Passed by House March 9, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 20, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5020 (HB 5020-A) Page 13